Maryland, session 2025, HB0407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–505.
(a) In addition to the other requirements of this subtitle, each county plan shall:
(18) For a county with a population greater than 150,000 according to the
latest Department of Planning projections, include a recycling plan by July 1, 2014 that:
(i) Provides for a reduction through recycling of at least 35% of the
county’s solid waste stream by weight or submits adequate justification, including economic
and other specific factors, as to why the 35% reduction cannot be met;
(ii) Provides for recycling of the solid waste stream to the extent
practical and economically feasible, but in no event may less than a 15% reduction be
submitted; and
(iii) Requires full implementation of the recycling plan by December
31, 2015; and
(19) For a county with a population less than 150,000 according to the latest
Department of Planning projections, include a recycling plan by July 1, 2014 that:
(i) Provides for a reduction through recycling of at least 20% of the
county’s solid waste stream or submits adequate justification, including economic and other
specific factors, as to why the 20% reduction cannot be met;
(ii) Provides for recycling of the solid waste stream to the extent
practical and economically feasible, but in no event may less than a 10% reduction be
submitted; and
(iii) Requires full implementation of the recycling plan by December
31, 2015.
(c) (1) The recycling reductions of 35% and 20% provided in subsection (a)(18)
and (19) of this section are not intended to be the maximum percentage that a county can
achieve.
(2) A county that can practically and economically achieve a higher rate of
recycling is encouraged to submit a recycling plan for a higher percentage.

HOUSE BILL 407 3
(d) If a county with a population less than 150,000 increases to a population of
above 150,000, the county shall have 2 years to revise the recycling plan to be consistent
with the recycling goals under subsection (a)(18) of this section.
(e) (1) The governing bodies of 2 or more counties may adopt a regional
recycling plan to comply with subsection (a)(18) or (19) of this section.
(2) A regional recycling plan which otherwise satisfies the requirements of
this subtitle for each of the participating counties shall constitute the county recycling plan
for each county which participates in the plan.
(F) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “LARGEST MUNICIPAL CORPORATION”
MEANS THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION WITH THE LARGEST POPULATION
ACCORDING TO THE MOST RECENT DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING PROJECTIONS.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (3) AND (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, AND EVERY 5 YEARS THEREAFTER, THE LARGEST
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN EACH COUNTY SHALL ADOPT OR UPDATE AS
NECESSARY A RECYCLING PLAN THAT:
(I) 1. PROVIDES FOR A REDUCTION THROUGH RECYCLING
OF:
A. AT LEAST 35% OF THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION’S
SOLID WASTE STREAM BY WEIGHT IF THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IS IN A COUNTY
WITH A POPULATION GREATER THAN 150,000; OR
B. AT LEAST 20% OF THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION’S
SOLID WASTE STREAM BY WEIGHT IF THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IS IN A COUNTY
WITH A POPULATION LESS THAN 150,000; OR
2. SUBMITS ADEQUATE JUSTIFICATION, INCLUDING
ECONOMIC AND OTHER SPECIFIC FACTORS, AS TO WHY THE REDUCTIONS UNDER
ITEM 1 OF THIS ITEM CANNOT BE MET; AND
(II) REQUIRES FULL IMPLEMENTATION OF THE RECYCLING
PLAN WITHIN 18 MONTHS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE RECYCLING PLAN IS
ADOPTED.
(3) IF THE GOVERNING BODIES OF 2 OR MORE COUNTIES ADOPT A
REGIONAL RECYCLING PLAN IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS
SECTION, THE LARGEST MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN THE REGION SHALL ADOPT A
RECYCLING PLAN THAT:

HOUSE BILL 407
(I) PROVIDES FOR A REDUCTION THROUGH RECYCLING OF:
1. AT LEAST 35% OF THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION’S
SOLID WASTE STREAM BY WEIGHT IF THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IS IN A REGION
WITH A POPULATION GREATER THAN 150,000; OR
2. AT LEAST 20% OF THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION’S
SOLID WASTE STREAM BY WEIGHT IF THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IS IN A REGION
WITH A POPULATION LESS THAN 150,000; AND
(II) OTHERWISE COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) IF A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IS NO LONGER THE LARGEST
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION AFTER THE MOST RECENT DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
PROJECTIONS, THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IS NO LONGER SUBJECT TO THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
5–306.
(a) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
Department shall prepare population projections for the State and for each county and
municipal corporation in the State.
(2) PROJECTIONS PREPARED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL IDENTIFY:
(I) IF APPLICABLE, THE LARGEST MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
BY POPULATION IN EACH COUNTY; AND
(II) IF THE GOVERNING BODIES OF TWO OR MORE COUNTIES
ADOPT A REGIONAL RECYCLING PLAN IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–505(E) OF THE
ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE, THE LARGEST MUNICIPAL CORPORATION BY POPULATION
IN EACH REGION.
(b) The population projections shall include details of age, sex, and race.
(c) The Department shall prepare the population projections for periods of 20
years, in 5–year intervals beginning with 1990.
(d) Beginning in 1991, the Department shall revise the population projections at
least every 3 years.

HOUSE BILL 407 5
(e) In preparing the population projections for the Washington metropolitan area,
the Department may use the population figures developed by the Maryland–National
Capital Park and Planning Commission.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.